Vermont statutes. Title 4 Judiciary
Subchapter 4. Payment by Credit Card

§ 741.
Payment by credit card.

[Repealed.]

If any such card draft is not paid by the bank or other company or is charged back to the court or bureau, any record of payment made by the court or bureau honoring the card shall be void. The obligation of the person to pay the court costs, fee, penalty, surcharge, or fine shall continue as an outstanding obligation as if no payment had been made.

Card account numbers, while in the possession of the court or bureau, are confidential.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 155

(Adj. Sess.), § 66d; amended

1999, No. 58

, § 2;

2003, No. 61

, § 4.